Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 8. Protection of Waterways for Anadromous Fish.

Sec. 16.05.865.
[Renumbered as AS 16.05.822.]

Sec. 16.05.868.
[Renumbered as AS 16.05.733.]

Sec. 16.05.870.
Protection of fish and game. [Repealed, E.O. No. 107, § 44 (2003).]

Sec. 16.05.871.
Protection of fish and game.

The commissioner shall, in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), specify the various rivers, lakes, and streams or parts of them that are important for the spawning, rearing, or migration of anadromous fish.

If a person or governmental agency desires to construct a hydraulic project, or use, divert, obstruct, pollute, or change the natural flow or bed of a specified river, lake, or stream, or to use wheeled, tracked, or excavating equipment or log-dragging equipment in the bed of a specified river, lake, or stream, the person or governmental agency shall notify the commissioner of this intention before the beginning of the construction or use.

The commissioner shall acknowledge receiving the notice by return first class mail. If the commissioner determines that the following information is required, the letter of acknowledgement shall require the person or governmental agency to submit to the commissioner:

full plans and specifications of the proposed construction or work;

complete plans and specifications for the proper protection of fish and game in connection with the construction or work, or in connection with the use; and

the approximate date the construction, work, or use will begin.

The commissioner shall approve the proposed construction, work, or use in writing unless the commissioner finds the plans and specifications insufficient for the proper protection of fish and game. Upon a finding that the plans and specifications are insufficient for the proper protection of fish and game, the commissioner shall notify the person or governmental agency that submitted the plans and specifications of that finding by first class mail. The person or governmental agency may, within 90 days of receiving the notice, initiate a hearing under AS

44.62.370

. The hearing is subject to AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

.

History.

(E.O. No. 114 § 3 (2008))

Cross references. —

See also AS

16.10.010

—

16.10.050

.

Administrative Code. —

For fish habitat, see 5 AAC 95, art. 1.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The purpose of this section is to protect and conserve fish and game and other natural resources. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10 (rendered under former AS

16.05.870

).

Alaska has jurisdiction to enforce its fish and game laws in national forests. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10 (rendered under former AS

16.05.870

).

Alaska’s protective fish and game laws, especially this section, complement rather than conflict with federal government functions in national forests and should be enforced by both federal and state officials. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10 (rendered under former AS

16.05.870

).

The Department of Fish and Game has permit jurisdiction over activities affecting anadromous streams, over activities in streams “frequented by fish” if those latter activities will result in the physical obstruction of that stream, and over all land use activities within the state refuge system.
March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen (rendered under former AS

16.05.870

).

This section gives the Department of Fish and Game jurisdiction over nonpoint pollutant sources adjacent to classified anadromous streams or their tributaries which, absent sufficient mitigating measures, would create a direct and substantial threat to pollution of the anadromous stream itself. March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen (rendered under former AS

16.05.870

).

The commissioner of the department of fish and game has the power to adopt procedural rules to implement this section and to establish by regulation the standards under which permits will be issued under this section.
March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen (rendered under former AS

16.05.870

).

When the Department of Fish and Game or Boards of Fisheries and Game have established a general policy of requiring plans and specifications in all instances involving specific types of activities, that policy can and perhaps must be codified by regulation.
March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen (rendered under former AS

16.05.870

).

The Department of Natural Resources, under the authority of AS

41.17.900(d)

, cannot preempt the regulatory authority of the commissioner of fish and game under this section over nonpoint source pollution of anadromous streams caused by logging activities. March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen (rendered under former AS

16.05.870

).

There is no statutory basis in either AS 46.03 or AS 41.17 for implying that the Department of Fish and Game’s authority over “non-point source pollution” under this section is limited by the § 208 program of the 1972 Federal Water Pollution Control Act (PL 92-500).
March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen (rendered under former AS

16.05.870

).

This section would seem to allow that the applicant submit, essentially, two permit applications — the first to determine whether a more detailed inquiry will be made, and the second to obtain the needed authorization.
March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen (rendered under former AS

16.05.870

).

The word “pollute” in subsection (b) should be viewed as a jurisdictional incident distinct from the other listed results or activities in that subsection and not as a specific enumeration which is to be construed to modify and limit the more general phrases.
March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen (rendered under former AS

16.05.870

).

The fundamental question concerning when a permit is required is whether the nature of the construction or work is such as to constitute a “desire to pollute,” and not what the individual hopes will or will not happen.
March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen (rendered under former AS

16.05.870

).

When read together, this section and former AS

16.05.880

[now this section] were a licensing statute.
March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen (rendered under former AS

16.05.870

).

There is no conflict between this section and AS

16.10.010

. March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen (rendered under former AS

16.05.870

).

This section has not been impliedly repealed by anything in Title 46, AS 41.17 or AS

16.10.010

.
March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen (rendered under former AS

16.05.870

).

Sec. 16.05.880.
Construction without approval prohibited. [Repealed, E.O. No. 107, § 44 (2003).]

Sec. 16.05.881.
Construction without approval prohibited.

If a person or governmental agency begins construction on a work or project or use for which notice is required by AS

16.05.871

without first providing plans and specifications subject to the approval of the commissioner for the proper protection of fish and game, and without first having obtained written approval of the commissioner as to the adequacy of the plans and specifications submitted for the protection of fish and game, the person or agency is guilty of a misdemeanor. If a person or governmental agency is convicted of violating AS

16.05.871

—

16.05.896

or continues a use, work, or project without fully complying with AS 16.05.871 —

16.05.896

, the use, work, or project is a public nuisance and is subject to abatement. The cost of restoring a specified river, lake, or stream to its original condition shall be borne by the violator and shall be in addition to the penalty imposed by the court.

History.

(E.O. No. 114 § 3 (2008))

Cross references. —

When read together, AS

16.05.870

[now AS

16.05.871

] and this section are a licensing statute. March 4, 1982 Op. Att'y Gen. (rendered under former AS

16.05.880

).

Opinions of attorney general. —

When read together, AS

16.05.870

[now AS

16.05.871

] and this section are a licensing statute. March 4, 1982 Op. Att'y Gen. (rendered under former AS

16.05.880

).

Sec. 16.05.890.
Exemption for emergency situations. [Repealed, E.O. No. 107, § 44 (2003).]

Sec. 16.05.891.
Exemption for emergency situations.

In an emergency arising from weather or stream flow conditions, the commissioner, through authorized representatives, shall issue oral permits to a riparian owner for removing obstructions or for repairing existing structures without the necessity of submitting prepared plans and specifications as required by AS

16.05.871

.

History.

(E.O. No. 114 § 3 (2008))

Sec. 16.05.895.
Penalty for causing material damage. [Repealed, E.O. No. 107, § 44 (2003).]

Sec. 16.05.896.
Penalty for causing material damage.

If a person or governmental agency fails to notify the commissioner of any construction or use that causes material damage to the spawning beds or prevents or interferes with the migration of anadromous fish, or by neglect or noncompliance with plans and specifications required and approved by the commissioner causes material damage to the spawning beds or prevents or interferes with the migration of anadromous fish, the person or governmental agency shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

(E.O. No. 114 § 3 (2008))

Sec. 16.05.900.
Penalty for violations of AS 16.05.870 — 16.05.895. [Repealed, E.O. No. 107, § 44 (2003).]

Sec. 16.05.901.
Penalty for violations of AS 16.05.871 — 16.05.896.

A person who violates AS

16.05.871

—

16.05.896

is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

The court shall transmit the proceeds of all fines to the proper state officer for deposit in the general fund of the state.

History.

(E.O. No. 114 § 3 (2008))

Administrative Code. —

For prohibitions, see 5 AAC 38, art. 4.

For fish habitat, see 5 AAC 95, art. 1.